District of Columbia statutes.
31-3451.10

Supplemental provisions; rules; exemption.

(a)

This chapter shall supplement the other provisions of the laws of the District and shall not preclude or limit any other powers or duties of the Commissioner under such laws, including Chapter 34 of this title and Chapter 13 of this title.

(b)

The Commissioner may promulgate regulations to implement this chapter.

(c)

The Commissioner may exempt from the application of this chapter a domestic health organization that:

(1)

Writes direct business only in the District;

(2)

Assumes no reinsurance in excess of 5% of direct premium written; and

(3)

Writes direct annual premiums for comprehensive medical business of $2 million or less.

June 18, 2003, D.C. Law 14-312, § 110, 50 DCR 306
2001 Ed., § 31-3851.10.